Wisconsin, session 2025, AB904.
do enact as follows:AB904,11Section 1. 961.443 (2) (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB904,2,32961.443 (2) (title) Immunity from criminal prosecution and revocation 3of parole, probation, or extended supervision.AB904,24Section 2. 961.443 (2) of the statutes is renumbered 961.443 (2) (a) and 5amended to read:AB904,2,136961.443 (2) (a) An No aider may have his or her parole, probation, or extended 7supervision revoked, and an aider is immune from prosecution under s. 961.573 for 8the possession of drug paraphernalia, under s. 961.41 (3g) for the possession of a 9controlled substance or a controlled substance analog, and under s. 961.69 (2) for 10possession of a masking agent under the circumstances surrounding or leading to 11his or her commission of an act described in sub. (1) if the aider’s attempt to obtain 12assistance occurs as soon as is practicable after the aider believes the other person 13is suffering from the overdose or other adverse reaction.AB904,314Section 3. 961.443 (2) (b) of the statutes is created to read:AB904,2,2015961.443 (2) (b) 1. No aided person may have his or her parole, probation, or 16extended supervision revoked under the circumstances surrounding or leading to 17an aider’s commission of an act described in sub. (1) if the aided person completes a 18treatment program as a condition of his or her parole, probation, or extended 19supervision or, if a treatment program is unavailable or would be prohibitive 20financially, agrees to be imprisoned in the county jail for not less than 15 days.AB904,3,912. If an aided person is subject to prosecution under s. 961.573 for the 2possession of drug paraphernalia, under s. 961.41 (3g) for the possession of a 3controlled substance or a controlled substance analog, or under s. 961.69 (2) for 4possession of a masking agent under the circumstances surrounding or leading to 5an aider’s commission of an act described in sub. (1), the district attorney shall offer 6the aided person a deferred prosecution agreement that includes the completion of 7a treatment program. This subdivision does not apply to an aided person who is on 8parole, probation, or extended supervision and fails to meet a condition under subd. 91.AB904,3,1010